Louisiana, session 2026, HB491.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.4(L) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.4. Parole; eligibility; juvenile offenders
* * *
L. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person serving
a life sentence of imprisonment shall be eligible for parole consideration pursuant
to the provisions of this Section if all of the following conditions have been met:
(1) The person is a first-time offender who has not been convicted of a crime
of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2 or a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
(2) The offender has served at least twenty-five years of the sentence
imposed.
(3) The offender has not committed any major disciplinary offenses in the
thirty-six consecutive months prior to the parole hearing date. A "major disciplinary
offense" is an offense identified as a Schedule B offense by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections in the Disciplinary Rules and Procedures for Adult Offenders.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1348 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 491
(4) The offender has completed the mandatory minimum of one hundred
hours of prerelease programming in accordance with R.S. 15:827.1.
(5) The offender has completed substance abuse treatment as applicable.
(6) The offender has obtained or completed at least one of the following:
(a) A literacy program.
(b) An adult basic education program.
(c) A job skills training program.
(d) A high school equivalency certificate.
(7) The offender has obtained a low-risk level designation determined by a
validated risk assessment instrument approved by the secretary of the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections.
(8) The offender has completed a reentry program to be determined by the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections.